Utah statutes.
48-2e-1004.   Pleading.

In a derivative action to enforce a right of a limited partnership, the complaint must state with particularity:

(1)  the date and content of the plaintiff's demand and the response to the demand by the general partner; or

(2)  why demand should be excused as futile.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

